District of Columbia statutes.
29-702.03

Statement of termination.

A dissolved limited partnership that has completed winding up may deliver to the Mayor for filing a statement of termination that states:

(1)

The name of the limited partnership;

(2)

The date of filing of its initial certificate of limited partnership; and

(3)

Any other information as determined by the general partners filing the statement or by a person appointed pursuant to § 29-708.03(c) or (d).

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-708.03.
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 203 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).